New York, session 2025-2026, A7250.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23 of the town law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 38 to read as follows: 3 38. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 4 in the town of Rushford, in the county of Allegany, the person perform- 5 ing the function of town justice, need not be an elector of such town. 6 Provided, however, the person performing the function of town justice in 7 any other town shall be an elector of such town, unless otherwise 8 provided by an act of the state legislature. 9 § 2. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision 77 to read as follows: 11 77. In the town of Rushford, in the county of Allegany, the provisions 12 of this section requiring a person to be a resident of the political 13 subdivision or municipal corporation of the state for which such person 14 shall be chosen or within which such person's official functions are 15 required to be exercised, shall not prevent a person from holding the 16 office of town justice of the town of Rushford; provided that such 17 person resides in a town which is in the county of Allegany. Provided, 18 however, the person performing the function of town justice in any other 19 town shall be a resident of such town, unless otherwise provided by law. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04494-02-6